Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 15 Referees, Auditors, and Masters in Chancery

9-15-1.
Reference by agreement of parties.

Any court may permit the parties in any civil action pending therein to enter into a rule of court to refer the action to the decision of one or more referees, to be agreed on by the parties, and also to refer in the same rule any other actions, causes of action, or suits that may exist between them, either jointly or severally, generally or specially.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 406; G.L. 1909, ch. 293, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 343, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 532, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-15-1

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 29.

9-15-2.
Reference without action or suit brought.

Though no action or suit is brought or pending, as provided in §

9-15-1

, the district court may permit any persons or corporations who have any cause or causes of action not following the course of equity and the superior court may permit any persons or corporations who have any cause or causes of action, existing between them, to enter into a rule of court to refer the cause or causes of action to the decision of one or more referees, as provided in §

9-15-1

, either jointly or severally, generally or specially; provided, that no rule entered into in the district court under the provisions of this chapter shall be made for any claim or claims which exceed in amount the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 407; G.L. 1909, ch. 293, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 343, § 2; P.L. 1929, ch. 1331, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 532, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-15-2

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 10; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 81.

9-15-3.
Certification of rule to another county.

Leave may be given under §

9-15-2

, in the superior court, to enter the rule in any county, to be certified to the county where the matter more properly belongs.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 408; G.L. 1909, ch. 293, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 343, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 532, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-15-3

.

9-15-4.
Contents and effect of agreement of reference — Majority report of referees.

The parties to any rule shall agree upon the mode of procedure, the defraying of expenses, the time when and manner in which the referees shall make their report, and the time and manner of issuing execution on the judgment or decree which the court shall enter, upon the coming in of the report; and every such agreement shall be conclusive upon the parties and upon their heirs, executors, administrators, and successors, and, if involving real estate, when notice thereof is duly recorded, upon their assigns, and a majority report of referees shall be binding and conclusive.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 409; G.L. 1909, ch. 293, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 343, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 532, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-15-4

.

9-15-5.
Oath of referee.

Every referee, before he or she proceeds to the business of the reference, shall be sworn to perform his or her duties faithfully and impartially as referee.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 412; G.L. 1909, ch. 293, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 343, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 532, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

9-15-5

.

9-15-6.
Judgment and execution on report.

Upon the coming in of the report of referees, the court shall enter judgment or decree thereon and in conformity thereto and issue execution accordingly.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 410; G.L. 1909, ch. 293, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 343, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 532, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-15-6

.

9-15-7.
Discharge or recommission of rule.

The court may, at any time in its discretion, on motion of either party, discharge a rule or recommit a rule and report to the same referees, or, with consent of the parties, to other referees; but a rule shall remain in full force until so discharged, and shall be continued without continuance fees, until report shall be made thereon.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 411; G.L. 1909, ch. 293, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 343, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 532, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

9-15-7

.

9-15-8.
Recording of decisions involving real estate.

Whenever any rule, entered into under the provisions of this chapter, shall concern the title to real estate, the referees shall report their proceedings, with a plat of the real estate in question showing the title as affected by their decisions; and if their report is finally received, a copy of the report and plat, certified by the clerk of the court where the rule is entered, shall be recorded in the records of land evidence in the town or city in which the estate shall be, and the expense of the record shall be a part of the costs of the party against whom the referees shall have decided, unless otherwise agreed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 414; G.L. 1909, ch. 293, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 343, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 532, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

9-15-8

.

9-15-9 — 9-15-17.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 415 — 423; G.L. 1909, ch. 293, §§ 10 — 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 532, §§ 10 — 18; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 30, effective January 10, 1966.

9-15-18.
Summons of witnesses and administration of oaths.

Referees and auditors shall have power to administer oaths in all matters tried before them, and also power to compel witnesses to attend and give testimony under oath in matters tried before them, in the same manner and by a similar process as courts of record, and any summons for witnesses may be issued and signed by any referee or auditor, or by any clerk of court, notary public, or justice of the peace.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 413; G.L. 1909, ch. 293, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 343, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 532, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

9-15-18

.

9-15-19.
Appointment of masters in chancery — Rules and orders.

The superior court, by a majority of the justices thereof, shall appoint in each county one or more standing masters in chancery to hold office during the pleasure of the court; and may make all such rules and orders, not contrary to law, with regard to proceedings before masters in chancery, their reports, and exceptions to and hearings on them, as to it shall seem expedient.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 424; G.L. 1909, ch. 293, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 343, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 532, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

9-15-19

.

9-15-20.
Protection of parties and witnesses in referred matters.

Masters in chancery, auditors, and referees shall have the same power to issue writs of protection to parties and witnesses in matters pending before them as is possessed by the courts from which they derive their appointment, and the signing of such writs by any one master, auditor, or referee, who has been duly sworn, shall be sufficient.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 425; G.L. 1909, ch. 293, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 343, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 532, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

9-15-20

.

9-15-21.
Stenographic reports and transcripts.

Masters in chancery, auditors, and referees may employ stenographers to report and transcribe the testimony taken in causes referred to them, and the cost of the reports and transcripts shall be allowed as part of the costs.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 426; G.L. 1909, ch. 293, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 343, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 532, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

9-15-21

.